Hawaii statutes.
[§425R-6] Termination of listing of
commercial registered agent. (a) A commercial registered agent may
terminate its listing as a commercial registered agent by filing with the
director a commercial registered agent termination statement signed by or on
behalf of the agent that states:

(1) The name of the agent as currently listed under
section 425R-5; and

(2) That the agent is no longer in the business of
serving as a commercial registered agent in the State.

(b) A commercial registered agent termination
statement takes effect on the thirty-first day after the day on which it is
filed.

(c) The commercial registered agent shall
promptly furnish each entity represented by it with notice in a record of the
filing of the commercial registered agent termination statement.

(d) When a commercial registered agent
termination statement takes effect, the registered agent ceases to be an agent
for service of process on each entity formerly represented by it. Until an
entity formerly represented by a terminated commercial registered agent
appoints a new registered agent, service of process may be made on the entity
as provided by law. Termination of the listing of a commercial registered
agent under this section does not affect any contractual rights a represented
entity may have against the agent or that the agent may have against the
entity. [L 2009, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next